Utah statutes.
10-6-115.   Budget -- Continuing authority of governing body.

After the conclusion of the public hearing, the governing body may continue to review any tentative budget and may insert such new items or may increase or decrease items of expenditure that were the proper subject of consideration at the public hearing, except there shall be no decrease in the amount appropriated for debt retirement and interest or reduction of any existing deficits, as provided by Section 10-6-117. It shall also increase or decrease the total anticipated revenue to equal the net change in proposed expenditures in the budget of each fund.



Enacted by Chapter 26, 1979 General Session

